Utah statutes.
75-2-1209.   Real estate conveyed to a trust under the Statutory Rule Against Perpetuities.

On or after the effective date, when title to real property is granted to the trustee of a trust governed by Title 75, Chapter 2, Part 12, Statutory Rule Against Perpetuities, the terms of the trust, provisions regarding the appointment of successor trustees, and the names and addresses of successor trustees must be disclosed in accordance with Section 75-7-816.

